lib/dict/hyph_sv.dic
y5snö
ysn2
y3so
ys4o2pr
ys2s2j1n
y2s1s
ys1s2j
ys2s1l2
ys2sm
ys2sn2
ys2st2
ys2s3v2
ys2tar
ys1ta
ys5ta4r.
ys5ta2r1n
ys5ta4rs
y1s2ta2rt
y5stav
y4s5t2e.
ys1te
ys2tek
ys2tor
ys1to
yst5rad
y5så
yta3b2
y1ta
yt2e2s
y1te
yt4h4e
y2t1h
yt5im
y1ti
y2to2ms
y1to
yt1or
yt5ra
y1try
yt2s1p2a
y2ts
yt1sp2
yt1s2t
yt3ti2ng4
y2tt
yt1ti
yt2tip
ytt5sa
yt2ts
yt3vå
y1tä
y1u4
y4un
yut5
y5va
y1ve
y1v4o
yvor5de
yvo2rd
y1vä
y1w
y3z
y1å
yår2
y3ö
4z.
3za
z2a4w
2zd
ze2b5
ze2e
ze1l
zer3o
zet2te
ze2tt
2zg
4z4h
3zi
zi5s1ta
z1j4
2zl
z3ly
zo2n3g2
zo2n3o
4zs
z5sc
2zt
1zu
1zy
2z1z
4å.
å5ad
å3a4l
åa1l5a
åa2lar
åa1l5e
å1an
å1ar
å1as
å5at
å5ax1
åc2
å4dav
å1da
å1dj
å5d4rar
ådr2
å5dro1g
åd3sl2
å2ds
åd5s1ma
åd5s4n2
åd2s1te
åd1st2
å3då
2å1e
åe1l5a
åf2l
å1f
åf2n
åf2r
2åg
å1ga
å5g4a.
å5gad
å5ga4r.
åg3a2r1m
å5ga2r1n
å5ga4rs
å5gat
å1ge
åge2l
å2ge2ne
åges2
å4g5g
åg1l
å3glas
åg5o1k
å1go
åg3om
å5gor
åg2ren
ågr2
åg1re
åg5rän
åg5rät
åg3s2k2
å2gs1
åg1st
åg1s2ta1di3
åg3stad
ågs1ta
ågstadie1e3
ågstadi1e
åg2str
åg2su
åg1sv2
ågs2va
åg5ä
åhos5
å1h
å1i
å1j
å1kal
åk3a2tt
å5k2e.
å1ke
1å4ker
å2ke4r.
åke2r3a
å1ki
å1kl
å2k1na
åk1n
åk2nep
åk1ne
åk4no
å5k1nä
å1ko
å1kra
åkr4
åk2re
åk4se
å2ks
åk2ska
åk1sk2
åk1s2t2
å1ku
å1kä
å1kö
å1la
å2l3a2rt
1åld2er
å2ld
ål1de
å5le1g
å1le
å2l5i2n1r
å1li
ål4jö
åll2sk
ål2ls
åll4sp2
ål3o2p
ål2san
å2ls
ål1sa
ål2se
ål5sko
ål5s1n2
ål2so2
ål5su
ål2sä4g
ål1sä
ål4s1öv
ål1sö
4å4lt
ål3tr
ål5ul
ål3up
å1ly
å3låd
ål5åk2
ålå2ke
å1lä
å1m
ån2dak
å2n1d
ån1da
ånd2st2
ån2ds
ån2go
å2ng1
ån2g3r2
ång5ska
ån2gs1
ångsk2
ång1s3ten
ång2s1te
ång5str
ån2gup
ån1gu
ån2gut
å2n5k4
ån5o2rd
å1no
ånor2d5e
ån2ser
å2ns
ån1se
åns4kar
åns2ke
ån2s5k2e.
ån5sl2
åns2te
å1ny
ånå2re
ån1år
å1o
åor5de
åo2rd
å1p
å2p3o2p
å1po
åpo2r4d
åp4r
å2ps
åp5sl2
å1ra
å2ra2kt
år5a2n1t
å4r5a2s1s
å2rav
2å2rd
år2dex1
år1de
år2do
år5d4ra
årdr2
åri2sa
å3riv
å2r4j
år3om
år3os
å4rs1
år1se2
år2si
års4ol
år1so
år2sö
år2t3s2
å2rt
år5ul
å1rum
år5up
å2r3v
år5å
å1rä
år1ö
år4ö.
år4öd
å1r4ör
år4öt
å5s4a.
å1sa
åsa2n
å5sa2n1d
å5sas
2åser
å1se
ås5kar
å2sk5ris
å1skr4
åsk2ri
åsk5rä
å2sk3v2
1å1skå
åsk5ö
å1slag
åsl2
ås5lak
ås3lam
ås4li
ås4me
å2s1ne3
åsn2
å1so
å2s3o2r1k
å1sp
ås2p2a
ås2pon
ås1po
4å2s1s2
åstar2
ås1ta
åstarr3o
ås2tar1r
ås2ti
ås2to
åst5ra
ås2tu
ås5tån
å1stå
å1su
ås3ve
åsv2
å2s1vi
åsving4es
åsvi2ng1
åså5re
å2ta2n1f2
å1ta
å2t3ap
å1te2
åt2er1
å3te2r1n
1å2t1g2
å1t2j
1å2t1k2
åt5om
å1to
å3t2re
åt3rik
å1t2rå
åt5rö
åt2sj
å2ts
åt3sl2
åt5s1mi
åt1te2
å2tt
åtti5o2n1d
åt1ti
åt5tä
å5ty
åtå5re
å1tö
å1u
åup2pa
åu2pp
2å1v
åves2
å4v1ra
åxt4
åx1
å3y
å3z
å1å
å1ä2
å3ö
å4ö1ka
ä1a
äb2b1l2
ä1b
ä2b1b
äb2les
äbl2
äb1le
äc2
äck5v2
ä4ck1
ä2da1f
ä1da
2ä2dd
äd2du
äde2l3s
ä1de
äde2s5s
äde2st
äd1r2
äds1l2
ä2ds
ä1e
äf2l
ä1f
äf1li5
äga2r3a
ä1ge
äge2s
äg2gu
ä4gg
äg1l
äg1r2
äg2sa
ä2gs1
äg1s2e
äg2si
äg2skr4
ägsk2
äg4s4t2e.
ägs1te
äg1s4ä
äg5un
ä1gu
ä3i
ä1k2a
äka2ri
ä1ki
äk1l
ä3ko
äk1r4
ä3kå
äkå5ka
ä1la
äla5g4
ä5la4r.
ä5la2r1n
ä5la4rs
äld2st2
ä2ld
äl2ds
äle4t
ä1le
äl5in
ä1li
älk2li
äl1k
äl2kå
äll2s3i
äl2ls
äl5län
äl2mak
ä2l1m
äl1ma
älo4
äl2pak
ä4l1p
äl1pa
äl2par
äl2pin
äl2por
äl1po
äl2p1re
äl2ps
äl2på
äls1ko
ä2ls
äl5skö
äl5sla
älsl2
äl5s1ma
äl2s1te
äl1st
ält1ra
ä4lt
äl5trä
äl1u
äl5v4a.
ä4lv
äl1va
äl2v5ak
äl5v4as
äl1vi2
äl2vän
äl1vä
ä3lå
äl3ö2
äm2k1n
ä2m1k
1äm1ne
ä2m1n
äm2n1år
äm2p1l
ä2m1p
äms2ko
ä2ms
äm1sk
3ändam
ä2n1d
än1da
än2dr2
änd5ra
än5gav
ä2ng1
äng5el
äng4e1se
än2gor
än1go
äng3r2
äng3se
än2gs1
än5ke
ä2nk
än4k1l
än5kå
än2n4äs
ä2n1n
än1nä
ä2n3o
än2sar
ä2ns
än1sa
än2s3in
än1si
än2sj
än2s3kr4
äns1l2
äns3t2er
äns1te
än2säl
än1sä
än2sö
4ä2n1t
än2te1g
än1te
än2t3r
än2t3u
ä5nö
ä1pe
ä1pi
äp2pin
ä2pp
äp1pi
äp5r
ä2p5s4k
ä2p4st4
ä3på
ä1ra
ä2r1ak
ä2r5a2re1a
ä1rar
ära1re
ä2r5av
ä2r3ax1
4ä2rd
ärd2st2
är2ds
ärds5å
ä4re1f
ä1re
ä2r3e4gg
äre1g
ä4rem
är5e1mo
ä5re2r1n
ä4r1ex1
ärför1u5
ä2r1f
är2g3l
ä2r1g
är2gr2
är2g5äk
ä1ri
är5i5b
äri2sa
ärk2st2
ä2r1k
är2ks
är2k1vi
ärkv2
är2lkr4
ä2r1l
ärl1k
är5men
ä2r1m
är1me
ärm3e2ti
är2m3up
är2mut
är2m3y2
är2n3e2k
ä2r1n
är1ne
är2n3i4s
är1ni
är2nå
är2nö
ä1ro
är3o1må
äro1v5a
ärr5u
är1r
är4sat
ä4rs
är1sa
är2sel
är1se
är2sid
är1si
är4s2ig
är5s4ka1ra
är2s1kar
ärs5ken
ärs1ke
ärs2ko
ärsk3os
är5skr4
är3slå
ärsl2
är5slä
ärs2n2
ä4r4s5o4rs
är1so
är2spr
är1sp2
är2s1ti
är1st
är4s2t3on
ärs1to
är2s3v2
är5så
ärså5re
är1s4ö5
är4t2em
ä2rt
är1te
är2tin
är1ti
är4tom
är1to
ärt5sl2
är2ts
ärt1s2t
ärt5sv2
är3u2
ärv1s3l2
ä2r1v
är2vs
är5år
ärå2re
är5åt
är3ä
är1ö
är4ö1a
ä2s1ap
ä1sa
äs2a2r1b
ä3scha
äsc2h
ä5schen
äsch4e
ä5schö
äs1ka
ä1s4kal
ä1s1k2i
äs3k1n
äs4kon
äs2k1or
ä1s5ky
ä1sk3ä
ä2s1l2
ä3s2löj
ä1so
äs3pi
äs2sc
ä2s1s
äs2skj
ässk2
äs2skr4
äs2sla
äss1l2
äs2s1le
äs2s1li
äs2som
äs2tan
äs1ta
äs3ta2n1d
äst3a2n1f2
äs2tig
äs1ti
ä1s2tol
äs1to
äst1r
ä2s2ts2
äs2t5up
äs1tu
äs5t2uv
ä1s5tä
äs3u
äs3vä
äsv2
äs5å
ä2säm
ä1sä
ä1s2ö
äta2n
ä1ta
ä2tap
äte1a2
ä1te
äte1i3
ät5el
äte2le
ä2tin
ä1ti
ät3r
ät5sn2
ä2ts
ät4s1po
ät1sp2
ät1s2t
ät5sv2
ät4t2il
ä2tt
ät1ti
ätt2s3an
ät2ts
ätt1sa
ätt2str
ätt1st
ät4tv
ät4tä
ä2t1u
ä5u
ä1va
ä2va2kt
ä1vak
äv3a2r1m
ä1ve
äv1s2t2
ä2vs
äx2tar
äx1
äx1ta
äx2to2
äx2tår
äxt5å
ö1a
öbe4l
ö1b
öbi2ls5
öb2lin
öbl2
öb1li
öc2
öderlä4g2e.
ö1de
öd2er
öde2r1l4
öderlä1ge
öde2s3
öd1r2
öd2re1v
öd1re
öd2riv
öd2s1an
ö2ds
öd1sa
öd2s1ar
öd2s3at
öd1s5kr4
öd2s1ta
öd1st2
öd5s1v2
öds2vi
öds3å
öd2sån
öd5å
ö2dö
ö1e
öf2l
ö1f
4ö2g.
ö1ga
ö4g5ad
ö2g1ak
ö4g5a2n.
ö1ge
ög5e1la
ög5e1li
öge2r1
öge4rs2
ö4gg2
ög5gr2
ög1l
ög2lop
ö2g1n1e
ög1n
ög2nen
ög2ner
ö2go
ög5o1k
ögo1n3o
ög3rö
ögr2
4ö2g1s4
ög1s2i
ögs2k2
ögs5te
ög5ä
ö4g2ö
ö1i
ö2jak
ö1ja
öje2s3
ö1je
ö1jo
öj3ä
ö1ka
ö2kak
ö1ki
ö1k2o2r4d
ökor3d5e
ök3ot
ök3ru
ökr4
ök5rä
ök4s5as
ö2ks
ök1sa
ök2s1in
ök1si
ök3so
ök2str
ök1st2
ök5sva
öksv2
ök5sö
ök5t1r
ö2kt
ök2ty
ök3u
öku2re
ö2kv2
ök5äg
ök3är
ö1la
ö2la2kt
öl4j5ak
öl1ja
öl2k1n
öl1k
öl4kv2
öl2pak
ö4l1p
öl1pa
öl2ve
ö4lv
ö5ly
ö3lä
öm2kl
ö2m1k
öms5ka
ö2ms
öm1sk
öm3sla
ömsl2
öm2sp
ö2nal
ö1na
ön2d5r2
ö2n1d
önes2
ö1ne
öne3sk
ön1g2r2
ö2ng1
ön5kå
ö2nk
ö2nom
ö1no
ön2so
ö2ns
önst1r
ön3y4
öny5tas
öny1ta
ö2n5ög
ö1o
4ö2p.
ö2p3a2r1b
ö1pa
ö1pe
ö2p5el
ö1pi
öp3lo
öp5ly
1ö2pp
öp3ru
ö2p5rå
4öps
ö2p2sk
öp1s2l2
öp2s1tu
ö2p1st4
ö4p3sv2
öp1s5å
öp2sår
ö1ra
ö2r1ak
ö2r3al
öra2n
ö5r2an1de
öra2n1d
ö2r1a2nk
ö2r1a2n1m
ö5ra4r.
ö1rar
ö3ra4rs
ö2r1b2
4ö2rd
ör1d4r2
örd5så
ör2ds
ördså5re
öre2na
ö1re
ör1e1ni
ö2r1e2nk
öre5st
öre3sv2
ör5eu1
ö2r3e4vig
öre1v
öre1vi
ö2r1g2
örgla5
ö1ri
ö2rid
öri2gi
ör5im
ö2r1i2ns
ö2r1i2n1t
ö2r3ir
ö2r3iv
ör2klo
ö2r1k
ör2k1na
örk1n
ör4k1re
örkr4
ör2kru
ör4k5ö.
ör4k5ös2
ö2r1l4
ör1o
ör5ra
ör1r
ör2sas
ö4rs
ör1sa
ör2sc
ör1sk
örs2ka
ör2sku
ör1sl2
örs2li
ör2s1po
ör1sp2
örs2ta
ör1st
ör2s3ti
ör4s2t5on
örs1to
örs2t2uk3
örs2tu
ör3sål
örs3år
ör1tv
ö2rt
ör1u4
ör1y
örå2ka
ör1ä
örä2r
ör1ö
örö2d
örö2va
ö2sak
ö1sa
ö2se1g
ö1se
öse2n5o
ös5kar
ös3mu
ö3so
ös2si
ö2s1s
ös2skä
össk2
ös4s1le
öss1l2
öss2t2
ö4s5t4a.
ös1ta
öst2an
ös5ta2n.
ös3t1a2n1v
ös5te4r.
ös1te
öst2er
ös2terby
öste2r1b
ös5ter2n.
öste2r1n
ös5ter2ns
ös2to
ö2s2ts4
öst5så
ö1st5å
ö1st5ä
östä2t
ö5su
ö2s3ö2
ö5t2a3k1l
ö1ta
ö2ta2kt
ö2t3e2k
ö1te
öt2e2s
öte3s2t
öt5ri
öt5ru
öt1s5t
ö2ts
öt2str
ött5så
ö2tt
öt2ts
ött3ä4
öt3v
ö1va
2ö2v1d4
öve2
ö5v2e.
öv2er1
öve1ri4
1översk
öve4rs
1öve2r1v
ö5ves
öv1r
öv2sly
ö2vs
öv1sl2
övs5ta
öv1st2
ö3vå
ö1vä
ö4v5ö4
öy4
ö5yr
